Utah statutes.
20A-16-404.   Timely casting of ballot.

To be valid, a military-overseas ballot shall be:

(1)  received by the appropriate election officer not later than the close of the polls; or

(2)  submitted for mailing, electronic transmission, or other authorized means of delivery not later than 12:01 a.m., at the place where the voter completes the ballot, on the date of the election.

